California, session 20252026, AB343.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7920.500 of the Government Code is amended to read:7920.500. For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 7928.200) of Chapter 14 of Part 5, “elected or appointed official” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(a) A state constitutional officer.(b) A Member of the Legislature.(c) An active or retired judge, court commissioner, or judge of the State Bar Court.(d) A district attorney.(e) A public defender.(f) A member of a city council.(g) A member of a board of supervisors.(h) An appointee of the Governor.(i) An appointee of the Legislature.(j) A mayor.(k) A city attorney.(l) A police chief or sheriff.(m) A public safety official.(n) A state administrative law judge.(o) An active or retired federal judge or federal defender.(p) A member of the United States Congress or appointee of the President of the United States.(q) An active or retired judge of a federally recognized Indian tribe.(r) An appointee of a court to serve as children’s counsel in a family or dependency proceeding.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which amends Section 7920.500 of the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:The California Public Records Act protects personal information, such as residence addresses and personal telephone numbers, of elected or appointed officials from disclosure. The need to protect elected or appointed officials and their families from harassment or targeted violence outweighs the interest in public disclosure of this information. SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.